incubator/tools/apertium-lex-acquisition/apertium-en-pt.pt.dix
    <pardef n="entrev/er__vblex">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eríamos</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eria</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eríeis</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erias</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eriam</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eria</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eremos</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erei</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ereis</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erás</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erão</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erá</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irmos</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irmo</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irmos</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irdes</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irde</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irdes</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ires</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ire</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ires</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irem</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irem</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantam"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantar"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endo</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endo</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__canta"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imos</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imo</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imos</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantaste"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>istes</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iste</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>istes</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iste</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iste</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantaste"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iram</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iram</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantam"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__canta"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejamos</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejamo</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejamos</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ede</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ede</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantaste"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ê</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ê</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantaste"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejam</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejam</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantam"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eja</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eja</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__canta"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantar"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ê</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ermos</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="infps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ermo</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="infps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ermos</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="infps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="infps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="infps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantaste"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erdes</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="infps"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erde</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="infps"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erdes</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="infps"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eres</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="infps"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ere</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="infps"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eres</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="infps"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erem</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="infps"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erem</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="infps"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantam"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="infps"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="infps"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__canta"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íamos</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íamo</l>
